Utah statutes.
59-11-114.   Confidentiality of information.
(1)  The confidentiality of returns and other information filed with the
commission shall be governed by Section 59-1-403, except that, by rule, the
commission may authorize the return of an estate to be open to inspection by
or disclosure to:
(a)  the personal representative of the estate;
(b)  any heir at law, next of kin, or beneficiary under the will of the
decedent, but only if the commission finds that this heir at law, next of kin,
or beneficiary has a material interest which will be affected by information
contained in the return; or
(c)  the attorney for the estate or its personal representative or the
attorney-in-fact duly authorized in writing by any of the persons described in
Subsection (1)(a) or (b).
(2)  Reports and returns shall be preserved as provided in Section 59-1-403.
(3)  Any person who violates Subsection (1) is subject to the penalty provided
in Section 59-1-403.
